Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 9. Council-Manager Plan of Government

§ 21-9-1.
Adoption of council-manager plan by certain municipalities; applicability of Title 21.

Any city or town as defined by law, regardless of the form of government under which it is operating, may adopt the council-manager plan of government by the procedure hereinafter set forth. Wherever the word “city” is used in this chapter, it shall be construed to refer to “city or town.”

All of the provisions of this title, derived from Chapter 491, Laws of 1950, with reference to the government of municipalities, not inconsistent with the terms and provisions of this chapter, shall be applicable to any municipality operating under the council-manager plan of government as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825.5-01, 3825.5-46; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, §§ 1, 46; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, §§ 1, 21.

§ 21-9-3.
Initiating proceedings for adoption.

The manner of effecting the change in the government of any such city from the form of government under which it is operating to the council-manager plan of government shall be as follows:

One or more petitions, similar in form and substance, addressed to the mayor, praying that an election be held to determine whether or not such city shall abandon its existing form of government and become organized under a council-manager plan of government, signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors of such city, shall be filed with the city clerk, who shall within ten (10) days thereafter check the signatures thereto with the registration books of the city and attach thereto his certificate showing the total number of qualified electors in said city, and the total number of signatures to said petitions and deliver the same to the mayor.

If, on the delivery of such petition to the mayor, it shall appear that such petition or petitions have not been signed by the required number of qualified electors of such city, the mayor shall at once certify such fact and immediately return such petition or petitions to the person or persons presenting the same, who may thereafter procure additional signers thereto and again file such petition or petitions with the city clerk, as above provided, as an original petition.

If it shall at any time appear from the certificate of the city clerk that said petition or petitions have been signed by the required number of qualified electors of said city, the mayor shall immediately refer the same to the city council or board and if it shall appear that said petition or petitions are in proper form and have been sufficiently signed by the qualified electors of such city, the council or board shall within five (5) days order and provide for the holding of a special election in such city not less than twenty (20) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of making such order, notice of which shall be given, and the same shall be held and conducted as other elections in such city. At such special election the propositions to be voted for shall be: (1) “FOR THE PRESENT FORM OF GOVERNMENT” and “FOR THE COUNCIL-MANAGER PLAN OF GOVERNMENT,” and (2) “FOR COUNCILMEN ELECTED AT LARGE” and “FOR COUNCILMEN ELECTED BY WARDS,” which propositions shall be printed on the official ballot at such election.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-02; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 2; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 439, § 1, eff from and after June 25, 1974 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections to this amendment).

§ 21-9-5.
Results of election for change to council-manager form; effective date of change.

As soon as the returns of any election held hereunder for the adoption of the council-manager plan have been certified, and if a majority of the votes cast at such election were in favor of the council-manager form of government, the mayor of such city shall immediately certify to the secretary of state that such city, by special election, has adopted the council-manager form of government provided for herein, which certificate shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose by the secretary of state. Such form of government shall then become effective on the third Tuesday after said adoption.

In case it shall appear by said election returns that a majority of the votes cast at such election were in favor of the existing form of government, then the mayor and councilmen or aldermen shall dismiss the petition, in which case no similar petition or ordinance shall be filed for a period of two years from the date of such order dismissing the petition, but nothing short of such election shall preclude the filing of such petition and the holding of another election at any time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825.5-03, 3825.5-08; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, §§ 3, 8; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, §§ 3, 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 548, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1962).

§ 21-9-7.
Transition to council-manager plan.

All elected officials of the city holding office at the time the council-manager plan is adopted hereunder shall continue in office until the expiration of their respective terms of office. The mayor and councilmen or aldermen of the city, prior to the time of the effective date for the installation of the council-manager plan, shall have power to provide by ordinance for any details of the orderly transition from the prior form of government to the council-manager plan, not otherwise specified by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-04; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 4; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 548, § 2; Laws, 1965 Ex Sess, ch. 20, §§ 1-3.

§ 21-9-9.
Procedure for repeal of council-manager plan.

Any city which has adopted the council-manager plan, as herein provided, and which shall have operated under the council-manager plan for a period of three years, may discontinue the council-manager plan of government by a vote of the electors thereof initiated by a petition of twenty per centum of the qualified electors of said city, and the same procedure set forth in Section 21-9-3, shall be followed in determining whether such plan shall be discontinued. The propositions to be then voted on shall be: “For the council-manager form of government” and “Against the council-manager form of government.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-05; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 5; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 5.

§ 21-9-11.
Conduct of elections.

All elections held either for the adoption of the council-manager plan of government or for its discontinuance or repeal, shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general laws for the holding of municipal elections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-07; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 7.

§ 21-9-13.
Transition from council-manager plan.

In case the council-manager plan of government is discontinued or repealed by a majority vote of the qualified electors of such city, voting in an election for that purpose, as provided in Section 21-9-9, the next municipal election thereafter shall be conducted for such officials as are provided by law for such city under and according to that form of government under which it operated prior to the time that it adopted the council-manager plan of government. The elected officials then holding office under the council-manager plan shall continue in office until their duly elected successors under said form of government under which the municipality operated prior to the adoption of the council-manager plan shall take office. On the date on which such newly elected officials shall take office, as provided by law, the employment of such manager as shall have theretofore been employed by the council under the council-manager plan shall terminate, and all offices created under the provisions of this chapter shall terminate. Thereafter the municipality shall be governed by the general law applicable according to the form of government under which it had operated prior to adoption of the council-manager plan. The council or board shall have power by ordinance not inconsistent herewith to provide for the orderly transition from the one form of government to the other, in the same manner as is provided in Section 21-9-7. A city which has adopted the council-manager plan and subsequently discontinues it, as herein provided, may readopt it by following the same procedure as that herein set forth for its original adoption, and it may likewise thereafter so discontinue the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-06; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 6; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 6.

§ 21-9-15.
Municipal council; election of councilmen and mayor; terms.

The legislative power of any city in which the council-manager plan of government is in effect under this chapter shall be vested in a council consisting of a mayor and five (5) councilmen.

Any city with a larger or smaller number of councilmen, prior to September 30, 1962, may retain this larger or smaller number of councilmen or may adopt the council size of five (5) as prescribed herein. This option shall be exercised through the enactment of an appropriate ordinance by the municipal governing body prior to the election to adopt the council-manager plan of government. In the event the council fails to exercise this option, the council shall consist of five (5) councilmen.

At the next regular municipal election which takes place after the adoption of the council-manager form of government, the mayor shall be elected at large by the voters of the entire city. Also, the councilmen shall be elected at large by the voters of the entire city to represent a city-wide district, or each of four (4) councilmen may be elected from a ward to represent such ward and one (1) councilman may be elected to represent a city-wide district. This option shall be exercised by an appropriate ordinance enacted by the city governing body prior to the election to adopt the council-manager plan of government. In the event the council fails to exercise this option, the councilmen shall be elected at large to represent the city-wide district. In its discretion at any time after adoption and implementation of the council-manager plan of government the council may provide for the election of councilmen by wards as provided herein, which shall become effective at the next regularly scheduled election for city councilmen.

Councilmen elected to represent wards must be residents of their wards; and in cities having more or fewer than five (5) councilmen, prior to September 30, 1962, the city governing body shall determine the number of councilmen to represent the wards and the number of councilmen to represent the city-wide district.

The council of any municipality having a population exceeding forty-five thousand (45,000) inhabitants according to the 1970 decennial census which is situated in a Class 1 county bordering on the State of Alabama and which is governed by a council-manager plan of government on January 1, 1977, may, in its discretion, adopt an ordinance to require the election of four (4) of the five (5) council members from wards and not from the city at large. The four (4) council members shall be elected one (1) each from the wards in which they reside in the municipality, and shall be elected only by the registered voters residing within the ward in which the council member resides. The mayor and fifth council member may continue to be elected from the city at large. Any council member who shall remove his residence from the ward from which he was elected shall, by operation of law, vacate his seat on the council.

After publication of the population of the municipality according to the 1980 decennial census, the governing authorities of the municipality shall designate the geographical boundaries of new wards as provided in this subparagraph. Each ward shall contain as nearly as possible the population factor obtained by dividing by four (4) the city’s population as shown by the 1980 and each most recent decennial census thereafter. It shall be the mandatory duty of the council to redistrict the city by ordinance, which ordinance may not be vetoed by the mayor, within six (6) months after the official publication by the United States of the population of the city as enumerated in each decennial census, and within six (6) months after the effective date of any expansion of municipal boundaries; provided, however, if the publication of the most recent decennial census or effective date of an expansion of the municipal boundaries occurs six (6) months or more prior to the first primary of a general municipal election, then the council shall redistrict the city by ordinance within at least sixty (60) days of such first primary. If the publication of the most recent decennial census occurs less than six (6) months prior to the first primary of a general municipal election, the election shall be held with regard to currently defined wards; and reapportioned wards based on the census shall not serve as the basis for representation until the next regularly scheduled election in which council members shall be elected. If annexation of additional territory into the municipal corporate limits of the city shall occur less than six (6) months prior to the first primary of a general municipal election, the city council shall, by ordinance adopted within three (3) days of the effective date of such annexation, assign such annexed territory to an adjacent ward or wards so as to maintain as nearly as possible substantial equality of population between wards. Any subsequent redistricting of the city by ordinance as required by this section shall not serve as the basis for representation until the next regularly scheduled election for city councilmen.

However, in any municipality situated in a Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi Sound and the State of Alabama, traversed by U.S. Highway 90, the legislative power of such municipality in which the council-manager plan of government is in effect shall be vested in a council consisting of a mayor and six (6) councilmen. In the next regular municipal election in such municipality, the mayor shall be elected at large by the voters of the entire municipality. Also, the councilmen shall be elected at large by the voters of the entire municipality to represent a municipality-wide district, or each of five (5) councilmen may be elected from one (1) of five (5) wards to represent said ward and one (1) councilman shall be elected to represent a municipality-wide district. This option as to wards shall be exercised by an appropriate ordinance enacted by the municipal governing body. In the event the council fails to exercise this option, the councilmen shall be elected at large to represent the municipality-wide district. Councilmen elected to represent wards must be residents of their wards.

The method of electing the mayor and councilmen shall be the same as otherwise provided by law except as provided in this chapter. The mayor and councilmen elected hereunder shall hold office for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are elected and qualified. No person shall be eligible to the office of mayor or councilman unless he is a qualified elector of such city.

In the event a city with a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more inhabitants according to the last decennial census adopts the council-manager form of government, the legislative power of said city shall be vested in a council consisting of a mayor and eight (8) councilmen.

At the next regular municipal election which takes place after the adoption of the council-manager form of government, the mayor shall be elected at large by the voters of the entire municipality. The municipality shall be divided into five (5) wards with one (1) councilman to be elected from each ward by the voters of that ward, and three (3) councilmen to be elected from the municipality at large. Councilmen elected to represent wards must be residents of their wards at the time of qualification for election, and any councilman who removes his residence from the city or from the ward from which he was elected shall vacate his office.

It shall be the duty of the municipal governing body existing at the time of the adoption of the council-manager form of government to designate the geographical boundaries of the five (5) wards within sixty (60) days after the election in which the council-manager form is selected. In designating the geographical boundaries of the five (5) wards, each ward shall contain as nearly as possible the population factor obtained by dividing by five (5) the city’s population as shown by the most recent decennial census. It shall be the mandatory duty of the council to redistrict the city by ordinance, which ordinance may not be vetoed by the mayor, within six (6) months after the official publication by the United States of the population of the city as enumerated in each decennial census, and within six (6) months after the effective date of any expansion of municipal boundaries; however, if the publication of the most recent decennial census or effective date of an expansion of the municipal boundaries occurs six (6) months or more prior to the first primary of a general municipal election, then the council shall redistrict the city by ordinance within at least sixty (60) days of such first primary. If the publication of the most recent decennial census occurs less than six (6) months prior to the first primary of a general municipal election, the election shall be held with regard to currently defined wards; and reapportioned wards based on the census shall not serve as the basis for representation until the next regularly scheduled election in which city councilmen shall be elected. If annexation of additional territory into the municipal corporate limits of the city shall occur less than six (6) months prior to the first primary of a general municipal election, the city council shall, by ordinance adopted within three (3) days of the effective date of such annexation, assign such annexed territory to an adjacent ward or wards so as to maintain as nearly as possible substantial equality of population between wards; any subsequent redistricting of the city by ordinance as required by this section shall not serve as the basis for representation until the next regularly scheduled election for city councilmen.

The method of electing the mayor and councilmen shall be the same as otherwise provided by law, except as provided in this chapter. The mayor and councilmen elected hereunder shall hold office for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are elected and qualified. No person shall be eligible to the office of mayor or councilman unless he is a qualified elector of such city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825.5-09, 3825.5-35; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, §§ 9, 35; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, §§ 8, 18; Laws, 1962, ch. 548, § 3; Laws, 1971, ch. 384, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 439, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 462, § 1, eff from and after January 3, 1989 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment); brought forward without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 340, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 21-9-17.
Primary election for candidates for mayor and councilmen.

Except as otherwise provided, all candidates for mayor and councilmen, or any of them, to be voted for at any general or special municipal election, shall be nominated by party primary election, and no other name or names shall be placed on the official ballot at such general or special election than those selected in the manner prescribed herein. Such primary election or elections, shall be held not less than ten, nor more than thirty days, preceding the general or special election, and such primary election or elections shall be held and conducted in the manner as near as may be as is provided by law for state and county primary elections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-10; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 10; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 9.

§ 21-9-19.
Conduct of municipal council election; declaring results.

At all elections held to choose a mayor and councilmen, or any of them, the choice of the person or persons voting shall be indicated and the ballots shall be marked in like manner as is provided by law for general state and county elections.

The poll managers at all special and general elections for mayor and councilmen, or any of them, shall immediately, upon the closing of the polls, count the ballots and ascertain the number of votes cast in each voting precinct for each of the candidates and make return thereof to the municipal election commissioners. On the day following any special or general election, the municipal election commissioners shall canvass the returns so received from all the voting precincts, and shall within six (6) business days after such special or general election, deliver to each person receiving the highest number of votes a certificate of election. If it shall appear by the returns that any two (2) candidates for mayor or councilmen, have received an equal number of votes, the election shall be decided by a toss of a coin or by lot, fairly and publicly drawn under the direction of the election commissioners, with the aid of a friend of each such candidates, and a certificate of election shall be given accordingly.

The election commissioners shall, within ten (10) business days after any special or general election, certify to the Secretary of State the name or names of the person or persons elected at such special or general election, and the Secretary of State shall, immediately upon receiving such certificates, deliver the same to the Governor, who shall immediately issue commissions to the persons mentioned in certificate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825.5-11, 3825.5-12; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, §§ 11, 12; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 184, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017.).

§ 21-9-21.
Appointment of officials and employees of city other than councilmen and mayor; surety bond.

In a city in which the council-manager plan of government is in effect under the provisions of this chapter, no city official or employee shall be elected by the voters except members of the council and the mayor. All other officials and employees shall be appointed as hereinafter provided.

The city council shall require all officers and employees handling or having the custody of any of the public funds of such municipality to give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in an amount to be determined by the council (which shall not be less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00)), the premium on which bonds shall be paid by the city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-13; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 13; Laws, 1950, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 26; Laws, 1988, ch. 488, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 21-9-23.
Transfer of administrative functions to city manager.

Members of the city council shall have no administrative powers or duties. All such powers or duties vested in members of the governing body of the city before adoption of the council-manager plan of government shall be transferred to the city manager or his subordinates.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-24; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 24.

§ 21-9-25.
City manager; choosing thereof.

The first city council elected under the provisions of this chapter shall at its first meeting employ by majority vote of all its members a city manager who shall be the chief administrative officer of the city. The manager shall receive such compensation as the council shall determine, and shall be chosen solely on the basis of his or her experience and administrative qualifications. The manager shall not engage in any other business or profession that conflicts with the duties of the office of city manager so long as such person holds the office of city manager. Before the city manager engages in any other business or profession, the manager shall give notice of such business or profession to the city council. No person elected to the city council shall be eligible for the office of city manager during the term for which the person was elected.

If the office of city manager becomes vacant, the city council shall appoint without delay a new manager or an acting manager to fill the office until a new manager is designated.

In case of the absence or disability of the city manager, the city council may appoint a qualified person to perform the duties of the city manager temporarily.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825.5-15, 3825.5-20; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, §§ 15, 20; Laws, 2011, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2011.).

§ 21-9-27.
City manager; term of office; removal.

The city manager shall hold office for such period (not to exceed four years for any one specified period) as may be provided by ordinance, and shall be eligible for reemployment, successively or otherwise. The manager may be removed at any time by a vote of a majority of all the members of the council. However, he shall not be so removed until the reasons for his proposed removal have been furnished him in writing, and until he has received a public hearing thereon before the council, if he so requests. Pending and during such hearing the council may suspend him from office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-16; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 16; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 11.

§ 21-9-29.
Duties of city manager.

The city manager shall, subject to law:

be responsible to the council for the entire administration of the city government;

prepare and recommend to the council an annual budget;

administer and secure the enforcement of all laws and ordinances of the city;

appoint and remove all department heads and other employees of the city, except that notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the council shall appoint the city attorney, the auditor, and the police justice, if any, and the council may, in its discretion, appoint the city clerk and treasurer;

supervise and control all department heads and other employees and their subordinates;

negotiate contracts and make all purchases for the city, subject to existing laws and subject to the approval of the council;

see that all terms and conditions imposed in favor of the city or its inhabitants in any statute or municipal ordinance regarding public utility franchises or other contracts are faithfully kept and performed, and upon knowledge of any violation thereof call the same to the attention of the council;

make such recommendations to the council as he may deem expedient or necessary;

make reports or recommendations to the council upon request, and at least once a year present a written report of his work and the financial condition of the city for the information of the council and of the public;

perform such other duties as may be required by ordinance or resolution of the city council.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825.5-17, 3825.5-27; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, §§ 17, 27; Laws, 1950, ch. 503, § 2; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, §§ 12, 14.

§ 21-9-31.
Control of manager and his subordinates by council.

Neither the mayor nor any of the members of the council or committees of the council shall direct or dictate the appointment of any person to or his removal from office by the manager or any of his subordinates. Except for the purposes of inquiring or receiving information or advice, the mayor and council and the several members thereof shall deal with the administrative services solely through the manager and neither the mayor nor any member of the council shall give orders to any subordinate of the city. The city council shall have the power to investigate any part of the city government and for that purpose to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and other evidence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-18; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 18.

§ 21-9-33.
Attendance of manager and other officials at council meetings.

The manager and such other officers as the council shall determine shall meet regularly with the city council and have full privileges of discussion but no vote.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-19; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 19.

§ 21-9-35.
City council to act as governing body of city.

The mayor and councilmen shall constitute the governing body of such city or town and shall be known as the city council or the town council as the case may be. Except as limited in this chapter, the city council shall have, exercise and perform all executive, legislative and judicial powers, duties and obligations vested by law in the mayor and governing body acting for the city at the time of the adoption by such city of the council-manager form of government.

The corporate name of every such city or town shall be “The City of (name of city),” or “The Town of (name of town),” under which name the council shall exercise and perform all the corporate powers, duties and obligations conferred or imposed on it or the members thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825.5-14, 3825.5-29; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, §§ 14, 29; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 10.

§ 21-9-37.
Function of the mayor.

The mayor shall be the titular head of the city for all ceremonial purposes and for all processes of law. He shall be the president of the council and shall have a voice and vote in its proceedings, but no power of veto. He shall have no administrative powers. In case of his absence or disability, the council may appoint another of its members to fulfill his duties temporarily.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-14; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 14; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 10.

§ 21-9-39.
Meetings of the council; quorum; voting.

Regular public meetings of the council shall be held on the first Tuesday of each month, at such time of day as the council may provide. When a regular meeting of the council shall fall on a holiday, the council shall meet the following day. Special meetings may be called at any time by the mayor or two (2) councilmen on at least two (2) days’ notice to the mayor and each member of the council. A special meeting may also be held at any time by written consent of the mayor and all members of the council. At all meetings of the council, a majority of the members thereof shall constitute a quorum. The quorum required by this section may be established by teleconference or video means as provided in Section 25-41-5(2). The affirmative vote of a majority of all of the members of the council shall be necessary to adopt any motion, resolution or ordinance, or to pass any measure whatever, unless a greater number is provided in this chapter. Upon every vote taken by the council, the yeas and nays shall be called and recorded, and every motion, resolution or ordinance shall be reduced to writing before the vote is taken thereon. Upon request of one or more council members, any motion, resolution or ordinance shall be read by the clerk before the vote is taken thereon. The city or town manager may be appointed only at a regular meeting of the council with no less than a majority of the members, plus one (1), in attendance.

The council may, pursuant to Section 21-17-17, set a day other than Tuesday for the holding of its regular monthly meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-28; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 28; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 15; Laws, 1973, ch. 324, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 403, § 5; Laws, 1987, ch. 503, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 442, § 6; Laws, 2017, ch. 319, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 21-9-41.
Mayor and councilmen not required to have offices or office hours.

Neither the mayor nor councilmen shall be required to have any office in the city hall, nor shall they be required to have any office hours.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-23; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 23.

§ 21-9-43.
Council members shall not serve as members of commissions or boards under their control.

A member of the city council shall neither be a member of any commission or board appointed by the city council nor serve as a member of any commission or board under the jurisdiction of the city council, except as otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-13; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 13; Laws, 1950, ch. 503, § 1.

§ 21-9-45.
Reorganization of city government at behest of council.

The council may, by ordinance, create new departments and offices as shall appear proper but only on recommendation of the city manager, and shall likewise fix the powers and duties and number of employees and compensation therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-25; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 25.

§ 21-9-47.
Hours of service of city officers and employees.

The city council shall, by resolution, fix the hours of service of all officers and employees of the city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-23; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 23.

§§ 21-9-49 and 21-9-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 330, eff from and after April 14, 1980.

§21-9-49. [Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-31; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 31; Laws, 1956, ch. 403]

§21-9-51. [Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-32; Laws, 1948, ch 385, § 32; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 17]

§ 21-9-53.
Annual examination and statement to be made by council.

At the end of each fiscal year, the council shall cause a full and complete examination of all the books, accounts and vouchers of the city to be made by a competent accountant or accountants. The report of said examination shall be typed or printed in pamphlet form including a detailed, itemized statement of all receipts and disbursements for the year, and a summary of the proceedings of the council during the year. The council shall furnish a copy of said pamphlet, free of charge, to all persons who shall apply therefor at the office of the clerk, and shall cause three of the printed copies of said pamphlet for each fiscal year to be substantially bound in three volumes, which shall be kept and preserved as a record of the clerk’s office. Said pamphlets shall be published as now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-38; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 38; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 19.

§ 21-9-55.
Appropriations by first elected council.

If at the beginning of the first term of office of the first city council elected by any city under the provisions of this chapter, the appropriations for the expenditures for the city government for the current fiscal year shall have been made, the council shall have power, by ordinance, to revise, to repeal, or change said appropriations and to make additional appropriations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-39; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 39.

§ 21-9-57.
Power of council may be limited as to tax rates or bond issuances.

Any city operating under the council-manager form of government may by ordinance adopted by the council and approved by a two-thirds majority of the qualified electors, voting thereon, at a special or general election in such city, fix the maximum rate of general taxation to be thereafter levied by the council, and also fix the maximum amount of the bonds or other obligations of such city that may be issued, any general or special law applicable to such city to the contrary notwithstanding. However, in the absence of such ordinance or ordinances, so adopted and approved, the maximum rate of general taxation in such city and the maximum amount of the bonds or obligations of such city that may be issued, shall be the same as is provided elsewhere by law or the charter of such city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-42; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 42.

§ 21-9-59.
Council may redistrict wards and voting precincts.

The council is authorized to provide by ordinance for the division of the wards, or if there be no wards, for the division of the municipality, into such number of voting precincts as may be necessary, each as nearly as possible containing the same number of qualified electors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-43; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 43; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 20; Laws, 1962, ch. 548, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1962).

§ 21-9-61.
Compensation of mayor and councilmen.

The compensation of mayor and councilmen in cities operating under the council-manager plan shall be fixed by ordinance of the council.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-21; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 21; Laws, 1952, ch. 372, § 13; Laws, 1974, ch. 439, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 534, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 21-9-63.
Salaries and their payment; overtime to members of police and fire departments.

The salary of the mayor, councilmen and all officers and assistants holding any office created by this chapter or by ordinance shall be paid in monthly installments on the first business day of each month, and the salaries or wages of all other employees of such city shall be paid at such periods as may be fixed by the council. No salaries or wages shall be paid to any officer or employee of such city until after the same shall have been earned.

Every officer or assistant, other than the mayor and councilmen, shall receive such salary or compensation as the council shall by ordinance, provide, and the salary compensation of all other employees of such city shall be fixed by the council from time to time, as occasion may demand.

The city council of any city operating under the provisions of this chapter shall have the power and authority to provide for and pay to any member of the police department or fire department of such city additional compensation for services and duties performed by any such member over and above the usual and regular number of days and hours per week or month ordinarily worked by such member. Any additional compensation so paid shall be computed on the basis of the compensation regularly paid to such members of the police or fire department. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to relieve any such member of the police department or fire department from being subject to call for duty on a twenty-four hour basis whether or not additional compensation is paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825.5-22; Laws, 1948, ch. 385, § 22; Laws, 1952, ch. 373.